trunk/apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	<pardef n="трябва__vbmod">
	  <e>        <p>          <l>м</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ш</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l></l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ме</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>те</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>т</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>х</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ше</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ше</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>хме</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>хте</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ха</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>л</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ла</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ло</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ли</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>щ</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щия</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щият</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ща</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щата</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>що</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щото</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щи</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>щите</l>     <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>х</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>хме</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>хте</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ха</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>л</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ла</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ло</l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ли</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	  <e>        <p>          <l>йки</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>






	<!-- 1 спрежение, аорист на -ОХ -->
	<!-- несвършен вид
						съкратена основа в мин.св. деят. прич
						непреходен (няма мин стр прич)-->

    <e lm="трябва"><i>трябва</i><par n="трябва__vbmod"/></e>
